North Dakota, session 69, SB2355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Intelligent design - Required science content standard.
The superintendent of public instruction shall include intelligent design in the state science
content standards for elementary, middle, and high school students by Augus t 1, 2027. The
superintendent shall provide teachers with instructional materials demonstrating intelligent
design is a viable scientific theory for the creation of all life forms and provide in - service training
necessary to include intelligent design as part of the science content standards.
Page No. 1 25.1335.02000